New York, session 2025-2026, S1031.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 18-a of the public service law, as 2 amended by section 2 of part NN of chapter 59 of the laws of 2009, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 [1.] All costs and expenses of the department and commission shall be 5 paid pursuant to appropriation by the legislature on the certification 6 of the [chairman] chair of the department and upon the audit and warrant 7 of the comptroller. The state treasury shall be reimbursed therefore by 8 payments to be made thereto from all moneys collected pursuant to this 9 chapter. The total of such costs and expenses shall be borne by the 10 public utility companies (including for the purposes of this section 11 municipalities other than municipalities as defined in section eighty- 12 nine-l of this chapter), corporations (including the power authority of 13 the state of New York), and persons subject to the commission's regu- 14 lation, to be assessed in the manner provided in [subdivisions two, 15 three and four of this section and] section two hundred seventeen of 16 this chapter. 17 § 2. Subdivisions 1-a, 2, 3, 4, 4-a, 4-b and 5 of section 18-a of the 18 public service law are REPEALED. 19 § 3. Section 5 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 20 subdivision 7 to read as follows: 21 7. (a) The commission, in consultation with the comptroller, shall 22 develop a formula to determine the average cost, on a per ratepayer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01985-01-5 S. 1031 2 1 basis, to comply with the provisions set forth in article seventy-five 2 of the environmental conservation law, or any other rule or regulation 3 promulgated by a state agency prior to the effective date of this subdi- 4 vision, or any subsequent action taken thereafter, to meet the emissions 5 goals set forth by article seventy-five of the environmental conserva- 6 tion law. 7 (b) Beginning March first, two thousand twenty-six, the commission, 8 thirty days prior to issuing any order, directive, rule, or regulation, 9 shall disclose to the public through public notice and on their website 10 the cost, as determined by the formula developed by the commission per 11 this subdivision, of any order, directive, rule, or regulation issued to 12 comply with article seventy-five of the environmental conservation law 13 by the commission. 14 § 4. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 15 (bbb) to read as follows: 16 (bbb) Ratepayer protection credit. (1) Allowance of credit. An indi- 17 vidual taxpayer whose annual gross income does not exceed two hundred 18 fifty thousand dollars shall be allowed a credit against tax imposed by 19 this article for the cost of the implementation of article seventy-five 20 of the environmental conservation law as determined by subdivision seven 21 of section five of the public service law. 22 (2) Carryover of credit and refundability. If the amount of the cred- 23 it, and carryovers of such credit, allowable under this subsection for 24 any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, such 25 excess amount may be carried over to the five taxable years next follow- 26 ing the taxable year with respect to which the credit is allowed and may 27 be deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. For taxable 28 years beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-seven, if 29 the amount of the credit allowable under this subsection shall exceed 30 the taxpayer's tax liability for such year, the excess shall be treated 31 as an overpayment of tax to be credited or refunded in accordance with 32 the provisions of section six hundred eighty-six of this article, 33 provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. 34 § 5. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 187-s to read as 35 follows: 36 § 187-s. Ratepayer protection credit. 1. Allowance of credit. A 37 taxpayer shall be allowed a credit for the cost of the implementation of 38 article seventy-five of the environmental conservation law as determined 39 by subdivision seven of section five of the public service law against 40 the taxes imposed by sections one hundred eighty-three, one hundred 41 eighty-four and former section one hundred eighty-six of this article; 42 provided, however, that the amount of such credit allowable against the 43 tax imposed by section one hundred eighty-four of this article shall be 44 the excess of the amount of such credit over the amount of any credit 45 allowed by this section against the tax imposed by section one hundred 46 eighty-three of this article. 47 2. Carryovers. In no event shall the credit under this section be 48 allowed in an amount which will reduce the tax payable to less than the 49 applicable minimum tax fixed by section one hundred eighty-three or 50 former section one hundred eighty-six of this article. If, however, the 51 amount of credit allowable under this section for any taxable year 52 reduces the tax to such amount, any amount of credit not deductible in 53 such taxable year may be carried over to the following year or years and 54 may be deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 55 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.